Hawaii statutes.
[§11-422] Depletion of fund. (a)
The commission shall be under no obligation to provide moneys to candidates if,
in the partial public funding program or comprehensive public funding for
elections to the county of Hawaii council, moneys in the Hawaii election
campaign fund are near depletion.

(b) For the purpose of the partial funding
program, if the Hawaii election campaign fund is close to depletion as
determined by the commission, the commission shall determine the amounts
available to eligible candidates based on their order of eligibility in
qualifying for partial public funds, as determined by the date of filing of an
application for public funds with the commission pursuant to section 11-428;
provided that the application has been accepted by the commission.

(c) For the purpose of the comprehensive
public funding for elections to the county councils, if the Hawaii [election]
campaign fund is close to depletion, the commission shall determine whether the
program shall be operative in accordance with this part. [L 2010, c 211, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next